Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-757
Bonds; petition; notice; hearing.

The court shall fix the time for the hearing of the petition, and shall order the clerk of the court to give and publish a notice of the filing of the petition. The notice shall be given by publication the same day each week three consecutive weeks. The notice shall state the time and place fixed for the hearing of the petition and prayer of the petition, and that any person interested in the organization of the district or in the proceedings for the issuance or sale of the bonds may, on or before the day fixed for the hearing of the petition, move to dismiss the petition or answer thereto. The petition may be referred to and described in the notice as the petition of .......................... (giving its name) praying that the proceedings for the issuance and sale of such bonds of such district may be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 31, p. 207.